de: Für mehr Tierschutz 2 Sterne, Für mehr Tierschutz zwei Sterne, Für mehr Tierschutz Premiumstufe
xx: Für mehr Tierschutz 2 Stars, Für mehr Tierschutz two Stars

en: Carbon compensated product, carbon neutral
bg: Въглеродна неутралност
ca: Producte compensat en carboni, neutre en carboni
da: CO2 neutral, CO2 kompenseret
de: CO2-neutral, CO2-kompensiert, kohlenstoffdioxidneutral hergestelltes Produkt, Kohlenstoffdioxid-kompensiertes Produkt, kohlenstoffdioxidneutral
es: Producto carbono neutro
fi: hiilihyvitetty tuote, hiilikompensoitu tuote, hiilineutraali
fr: Produit compensé carbone, Carbone neutre, neutre en carbone, carbone compensé
hu: szénsemleges termék, szénsemleges, Szén-kompenzált termék
it: Impatto zero, Carbon neutral, Prodotto compensato al carbonio
nl: Kooldioxide neutraal
pt: Produto produzido em neutralidade de carbono, Produto neutral de carbono, produto neutro de carbono, produto neutro em carbono, neutro em carbono, neutral em carbono
ru: углерод компенсирующий продукт, углерод нейтральный

en: CO2e neutral, CO2e compensated, CO2-equivalent neutral, CO2-equivalent compensated
da: CO2e neutral, CO2e kompenseret
de: CO2e neutral, CO2e kompensiert, CO2-Äquivalent neutral, CO2-Äquivalent kompensiert
it: CO2e compensata, CO2 equivalente compensata
pt: Neutro em CO2, neutro em CO2e, compensado em carbono, compensado em CO2e

en: Carbon footprint, carbon emissions, product that specifies the carbon footprint, climate footprint
bg: Въглероден отпечатък
ca: Petjada de carboni, emissions de carboni, producte on la petjada de carboni hi surt reflectida
cs: Uhlíková stopa
de: CO2-Fußabdruck, CO2-Emissionen
es: Huella de carbono, Emisiones de CO2
fi: hiilijalanjälki, hiilipäästöt, hiilijalanjäljen määrittelevä tuote
fr: Empreinte carbone, émissions de carbone
he: טביעת רגל פחמנית
hu: Szénlábnyom, szén-dioxid-kibocsátás, karbonlábnyom, szén lábnyom, karbon lábnyom
it: Emissioni di CO2, impronta climatica
lt: Anglies dioksido pėdsakas, anglies dioksido išmetimas, produktas nurodantis anglies pėdsaką
nl: Koolstofvoetafdruk, Klimaatafdruk
pl: Ślad węglowy produktu
pt: Pegada de carbono, emissões de CO2, emissões em CO2, emissões de carbono, emissões em carbono
ru: CO2-эмиссия

en: Low climate footprint
sv: Lågt klimatavtryck

en: Climate Neutral Certified
xx: Climate Neutral Certified

en: 100% Climate Compensated
xx: 100% Climate Compensated, 100 % Climate Compensated

en: Climate Neutral product, Climate Partner
de: Klimaneutral Produkt, Climate Partner

en: Carbon Trust
xx: Carbon Trust

en: Carbon Trust Carbon Neutral
xx: Carbon Trust Carbon Neutral

en: Carbon Trust CO2 Measured
xx: Carbon Trust CO2 Measured

en: Carbon Trust Lower Carbon
xx: Carbon Trust Lower Carbon

en: Carbon Trust Reducing CO2
xx: Carbon Trust Reducing CO2

sv: Svenskt Sigill, Sigillmärkt
xx: Svenskt Sigill

sv: Svenskt Sigill Arbetsvillkor
xx: Svenskt Sigill Arbetsvillkor

sv: Svenskt Sigill Naturbeteskött
xx: Svenskt Sigill Naturbeteskött

sv: Svenskt Sigill Klimatcertifierad
xx: Svenskt Sigill Klimatcertifierad

en: Blue Angel
de: Blauer Engel
zh: 蓝色天使认证

en: Certified Belgian Abbey Beer
es: Certified Belgian Abbey Beer, Cerveza belga de abadía, Cerveza belga de abadía certificada
fi: Certified Belgian Abbey Beer, sertifioitu belgialainen luostariolut
fr: Bière belge d'Abbaye reconnue
it: Birra d'Abbazia Belga Certificata
nl: Erkend Belgisch abdijbier
zh: 认证比利时修道院啤酒

en: Belgian Family Brewers
de: Belgische Familien Brauer
fi: belgialaiset perhepanimot
it: Birrai Familiari Belgi
nl: Belgische familiebrouwerijen
zh: 比利时家族酿酒商